Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.07.300

Voting trusts.

(1) One or more shareholders may create a voting trust, conferring on a trustee the right to vote or otherwise act for them, by executing an agreement setting out the provisions of the trust, which may include anything consistent with its purpose, and transferring their shares to the trustee. When a voting trust agreement is executed, the trustee shall prepare a list of the names and addresses of all voting trust beneficial owners, together with the number and class of shares each voting trust beneficial owner transferred to the trust, and deliver copies of the list and agreement to the corporation's principal office.

(2) A voting trust becomes effective on the date the first shares subject to the trust are registered in the trustee's name.

(3) Limits, if any, on the duration of a voting trust are to be as set forth in the voting trust agreement. A voting trust that became effective when this section limited the term of a voting trust to ten years will remain governed by the provisions of this section then in effect relating to the duration of voting trusts, unless the voting trust agreement is amended to provide otherwise by unanimous agreement of the parties to that agreement.

[ 2020 c 57 s 55; 2017 c 28 s 15; 1989 c 165 s 77.]